Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.010

Duties of auditor.

The county auditor:

(1) Shall be recorder of deeds and other instruments in writing which by law are to be filed and recorded in and for the county for which he or she is elected;

(2) Shall keep an account current with the county treasurer, charge all money received as shown by receipts issued and credit all disbursements paid out according to the record of settlement of the treasurer with the legislative authority;

(3) Shall make out and transmit to the state auditor a statement of the state fund account with the county in accordance with standards developed by the state auditor. The statement must be available to the public;

(4) Shall make available a complete exhibit of the prior-year finances of the county including, but not limited to, a statement of financial condition and financial operation in accordance with standards developed by the state auditor. This exhibit shall be made available after the financial records are closed for the prior year;

(5) Shall make out a register of all warrants legally authorized and directed to be issued by the legislative body at any regular or special meeting. The auditor shall make the data available to the county treasurer. The auditor shall retain the original of the register of warrants for future reference;

(6) As clerk of the board of county commissioners, shall:

Record all of the proceedings of the legislative authority;

Make full entries of all of their resolutions and decisions on all questions concerning the raising of money for and the allowance of accounts against the county;

Record the vote of each member on any question upon which there is a division or at the request of any member present;

Sign all orders made and warrants issued by order of the legislative authority for the payment of money;

Record the reports of the county treasurer of the receipts and disbursements of the county;

Preserve and file all accounts acted upon by the legislative authority;

Preserve and file all petitions and applications for franchises and record the action of the legislative authority thereon;

Record all orders levying taxes;

Perform all other duties required by any rule or order of the legislative authority.

[ 2009 c 337 s 3; 1995 c 194 s 1; 1984 c 128 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.010. Prior: 1955 c 157 s 9; prior: (i) Code 1881 s 2707; 1869 p 310 ss 1, 2, 3; 1863 p 549 ss 1, 2, 3; 1854 p 424 ss 1, 2, 3; RRS s 4083. (ii) Code 1881 s 2709; RRS s 4085. (iii) Code 1881 s 2711; RRS s 4088. (iv) 1893 c 119 s 2; Code 1881 s 2712; 1869 p 311 s 6; 1863 p 550 s 6; 1854 p 425 s 6; RRS s 4089. (v) 1893 c 119 s 3; Code 1881 s 2571; RRS s 4090. (vi) 1893 c 119 s 4; Code 1881 s 2713; 1869 p 311 s 7; 1867 p 130 s 1; RRS s 4091. (vii) 1893 c 119 s 5; Code 1881 s 2714; 1869 p 311 s 8; 1867 p 131 s 2; RRS s 4092. (viii) 1893 c 119 s 7; Code 1881 s 2718; 1869 p 312 s 13; RRS s 4095. (ix) Code 1881 s 2719; RRS s 4098. (x) 1893 c 119 s 8; Code 1881 s 2720; RRS s 4099.]